Louisiana, session 2026, HB1035.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 18:1468.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§1468.1. Prohibited solicitation of campaign contributions
A. No person shall knowingly, willfully, or intentionally solicit a
contribution through the use of fraud, duress, deception, intimidation, undue
influence, exploitation, extortion, or the impersonation of a candidate or government
official.
B. For purposes of this Section, the terms "contribution" and "candidate"
shall be defined as in R.S. 18:1483.
C. Whoever violates any provision of this Section shall be subject to the
penalty provisions of R.S. 14:133.1.1.
Page 1 of 2
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2174 ENGROSSED
HB NO. 1035